apertium-nap.nap.dix
      <e><p><l>simmo state</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pts"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>simmo state</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pts"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>simmo state</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pts"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>fosse stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pps"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fosse stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pps"/><s n="m"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fosse stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pps"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fossemo state</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pps"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fossemo state</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pps"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fossemo state</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pps"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Condizionale - Conditional-->
      <e><p><l>sarrìa</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="pres"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarrìse</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="pres"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarrìa</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="pres"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarrìamo</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="pres"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarrìsseve</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="pres"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarrìano</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="pres"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>sarrìa stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarrìa stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarrìa stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarrìamo state</l><r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarrìamo state</l><r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarrìamo state</l><r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <!--Imperativo - Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>sie</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sia</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="f"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sie</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>simmo</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>site</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>siano</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <!--Participio - Participle-->
      <e><p><l>stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>manca</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <!--Gerundio - Gerund-->
      <e><p><l>essenno</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="pres"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>essenno stato</l><r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

	    <pardef n="'a__det">
	      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="'e__det">
	      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="'o__det">
	      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="'i__det">
	      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="'na__det">
	      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="'nu__det">
	      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="gl__prn">
	      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="napule__np">
	      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="pruvinc/ia__n">
	      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>ia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	      <e>       <p><l>ia</l>        <r>ia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	      <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ia<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    
	    <pardef n="secul/a__n">
	      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	      <e>       <p><l>o</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	      <e>       <p><l>e</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>

	    <pardef n="napulitan/o__adj">
	      <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	      <e>       <p><l>a</l>        <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	      <e>       <p><l>e</l>        <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="part/e__n">
	      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="stori/a__n">
	      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="nord__n">
	      <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="abitant/e__n">
	      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	      <e>       <p><l>i</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="canzon/a__n">
	      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	      <e>       <p><l>e</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	      <e>       <p><l>i</l>        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="crestian/e__n">
	      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	      <e>       <p><l>o</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="crestiana__adj">
	      <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="/e__cnjcoo">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="/a__pr">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="a__pr">
		<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="ca__adv">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="nun__adv">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>
	    <pardef n="cchiù__adj">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
	    </pardef>

    <e lm="â">		    <i>â</i><par n="'a__det"/></e>
    <e lm="'a">		    <i>'a</i><par n="'a__det"/></e>
    <e lm="'e">		    <i>'e</i><par n="'e__det"/></e>
    <e lm="e'">		    <i>e'</i><par n="'e__det"/></e>
    <e lm="'i">		    <i>'i</i><par n="'i__det"/></e>
    <e lm="le">		    <i>le</i><par n="'e__det"/></e>
    <e lm="'o">		    <i>'o</i><par n="'o__det"/></e>
    <e lm="o'">		    <i>o'</i><par n="'o__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ô">		    <i>ô</i><par n="'o__det"/></e>
    <e lm="'na">	    <i>'na</i><par n="'na__det"/></e>
    <e lm="na">	    	    <i>na</i><par n="'na__det"/></e>
    <e lm="na">		    <i>na</i><par n="'na__det"/></e>
    <e lm="'nu">	    <i>'nu</i><par n="'nu__det"/></e>
    <e lm="nu">	    	    <i>nu</i><par n="'nu__det"/></e>
    <e lm="gl">		    <i>gl</i><par n="gl__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="abitante">	    <i>abitant</i><par n="abitant/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="canzona">	    <i>canzon</i><par n="canzon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="comune">	    <i>comun</i><par n="abitant/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cumune">	    <i>cumun</i><par n="abitant/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cumune">	    <i>cumun</i><par n="abitant/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="crestian">	    <i>crestian</i><par n="crestian/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ccrestian">	    <i>ccrestian</i><par n="crestian/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="juorno">	    <i>juorno</i><par n="crestian/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="napu">	    <i>napule</i><par n="napule__np"/></e>
    <e lm="nomme">	    <i>nomm</i><par n="abitant/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nord">	    <i>nord</i><par n="nord__n"/></e>
    <e lm="parte">	    <i>part</i><par n="part/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pruvincia">	    <i>pruvinc</i><par n="pruvinc/ia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="secula">	    <i>secul</i><par n="secul/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="storia">	    <i>stori</i><par n="stori/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="se">		    <i>se</i><par n="/e__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="o">		    <i>o</i><par n="/e__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ô">		    <i>ô</i><par n="/e__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="o'">		    <i>o'</i><par n="/e__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="e">		    <i>e</i><par n="/e__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="'e">		    <i>'e</i><par n="'e__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ma">		    <i>ma</i><par n="/e__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="pure">     	    <i>pure</i><par n="/e__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="assaje">	    <i>assaje</i><par n="cchiù__adj"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="cchiù">   <p><l>chiù</l><r>cchiù</r></p><par n="cchiù__adj"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="cchiù">   <p><l>chiu</l><r>cchiù</r></p><par n="cchiù__adj"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="cchiù">   <p><l>cchiu</l><r>cchiù</r></p><par n="cchiù__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cchiù">	    <i>cchiù</i><par n="cchiù__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="crestiana">	    <i>crestiana</i><par n="crestiana__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="napulitano">	    <i>napulitan</i><par n="napulitan/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ca">		    <i>ca</i><par n="ca__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="la">		    <i>la</i><par n="ca__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nun">            <i>nun</i><par n="nun__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="â">		    <i>â</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="a">		    <i>a</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="cu">		    <i>cu</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="d">		    <i>d</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="d'">		    <i>d'</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="d '">	    <i>d '</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="d''a">	    <i>d''a</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="d''o">	    <i>d''o</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="d''e">	    <i>d''e</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="d''i">	    <i>d''o</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="de">	            <i>de</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="del">	    <i>del</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="da">	            <i>da</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="do">	            <i>do</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pe">	            <i>pe</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pe'">	    <i>pe'</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ppe'">	    <i>ppe</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="p''a">	    <i>p''a</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="di">	            <i>di</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="in">	            <i>in</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="n">	            <i>n</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="'n">	            <i>'n</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
